Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4923.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 16329. Fees for a person an individual who is licensed or seeking licensure to engage in the practice of optometry under part 174 are as follows: (a) Application processing fee $ 20.00 (b) Examination fees: (i) Complete examination 200.00 (ii) Examination, per part 50.00 (iii) Examination review 20.00 (c) License fee, per year 90.00 (d) Limited license, per year 25.00 (e) Temporary license 25.00 (f) Certification to administer diagnostic pharmaceutical agents or to administer and prescribe therapeutic pharmaceutical agents: (i) Application processing fee $ 20.00 (ii) Until the expiration of 10 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 17435, certification to administer diagnostic pharmaceutical agents 55.00 (ii) (iii) Certification to administer diagnostic pharmaceutical agents and to administer and prescribe therapeutic pharmaceutical agents 55.00 Sec. 16335. Fees for a person an individual who is licensed or seeking licensure to engage in the practice of physical therapy or practice as a physical therapist assistant under part 178 are as follows: (a) Application processing fee $ 20.00 (b) Examination fees: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Jurisprudence examination only 25.00 (b) (c) License fee, per year 90.00 (c) (d) Limited license, per year 25.00 Sec. 17428. Notwithstanding part 161, the board shall not require an applicant to pass an examination on the laws of this state related to the practice of optometry for licensure. Sec. 17826. (1) An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist assistant shall meet the requirements of section 16174 and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) and subject to section 17828, all of the following requirements, as applicable: (a) Is a graduate of a program for the training of physical therapist assistants approved by the board. (b) If graduated from a program described in subdivision (a) after January 1, 2008, has passed an examination approved by the board. (2) For the purposes of subsection (1)(a), the board shall approve a physical therapist assistant training program from the United States military or from outside of the United States if that training program is determined to be substantially equivalent to physical therapist assistant entry level training in the United States by a credentials evaluation organization approved by the American physical therapy association Physical Therapy Association or is listed as a credentialing organization in 8 CFR 212.15(e). Sec. 17828. Notwithstanding part 161, the board shall not require an applicant to pass an examination on the laws of this state related to the practice of physical therapy or practice as a physical therapist assistant for licensure. Sec. 18307. The Subject to section 18310, the board, in consultation with the department, shall promulgate rules under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 section 16145 setting forth the minimum standards for licensure as an occupational therapist. For purposes of this section, the professional standards issued by the American occupational therapy association Occupational Therapy Association or any other recognized trade association may be adopted by the board. The board shall not promulgate rules under this section that diminish competition or exceed the minimum level of regulation necessary to protect the public. Sec. 18309. The Subject to section 18310, the board, in consultation with the department, shall promulgate rules under section 16145 setting forth the minimum standards for licensure as an occupational therapy assistant. For purposes of this section, the professional standards issued by the American occupational therapy association Occupational Therapy Association or any other recognized trade association may be adopted by the board. The board shall not promulgate rules under this section that diminish competition or exceed the minimum level of regulation necessary to protect the public. Sec. 18310. Notwithstanding part 161, the board shall not require an applicant to pass an examination on the laws of this state related to the practice of occupational therapy or practice as an occupational therapy assistant for licensure.